epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/de_1901.xml
	<patterns>
		.ab1a
		.ab3l
		.abo2
		.ab3ol
		.ab1or
		.ack2
		.ag4n
		.ag4r
		.ag2u
		.ai2s
		.akt2a
		.al3br
		.al2e
		.al5l4en
		.al4tei
		.alt3s
		.ampe4
		.amt4s1
		.an3d2
		.anden6k
		.and4ri
		.ang2
		.an3gli
		.ang4s2
		.angst3
		.an3s
		.an4si.
		.ans2p
		.an4tag
		.an3th
		.aps2
		.ari1e
		.ark2a
		.ar4m3ac
		.ar2sc
		.ar4t3ei
		.as6sest
		.as2t
		.ata1
		.at4h
		.au3d
		.au2f3
		.aufs2
		.au2s1
		.ausch3
		.au6stes
		.ax2
		.äm3
		.ät2s
		.äu3
		.be3erb
		.bei6ge.
		.be3ra
		.be3r2e
		.berg3a
		.ber6gab
		.ber4g3r
		.boge2
		.bo4s3k
		.bu4ser
		.bus5sen
		.bu7sser.
		.ch2
		.dab4
		.da2r1
		.da4rin
		.darm1
		.da4te.
		.da4tes
		.de2al
		.de1i
		.de4in.
		.de1o2
		.de3r4en
		.derma3
		.dermas6
		.de3sk
		.dien2
		.do2mo
		.do1pe
		.dorf1
		.dü1b
		.ebe2r1
		.ehe1i
		.ei3e2
		.ei4na
		.einbus6
		.einen6g
		.ei2sp
		.ei2s1t
		.ei2tr
		.eke2
		.el2bi
		.em3m2
		.en1
		.en4d3er
		.en5der.
		.en2d3r
		.enn2
		.en2t3
		.epi1
		.er8brecht
		.er2da
		.er4dan
		.er4dar
		.er4dei
		.er4der
		.er1e
		.ere3c
		.erf4
		.er1i
		.ers2
		.er8stein
		.er8sterb
		.er8stritt.
		.er8stritten.
		.er4zen4
		.es1p
		.es2st
		.es2t
		.est4e
		.est2h
		.et2s
		.eu1
		.eu3g4
		.eu3t
		.eve4r
		.ext4
		.fä4s
		.fe2i
		.fer4no
		.fe4sta
		.fi4le.
		.fi4len
		.fi2s
		.flö8s7se.
		.flö8s7sen.
		.flö8sses
		.fs4
		.fu2sc
		.ga2t
		.gd2
		.ge5nar
		.ge3ne
		.ge3r2a
		.ge3r2e
		.ge3s4
		.get4
		.ge3u
		.grif8fes
		.guss1
		.haft3s
		.hal2s
		.hau2t1
		.he2
		.he3fe
		.her3an
		.he3ri
		.he6r5inn
		.ho4met
		.ia2
		.im2a
		.ima4ge
		.im5m
		.in1
		.in3e
		.ink4
		.inn2e
		.int6
		.inu1
		.ire3
		.is2a
		.jor3
		.ka2b5l
		.ka2i
		.kamp2
		.ka4t3io
		.ken6num
		.ker3s
		.ki4e
		.kle2i
		.kopf1
		.ks2
		.kus2
		.le4ar
		.li2f
		.lo4g3in
		.lo3ver
		.lö4s3s
		.lu4str
		.ma3d
		.ma2i
		.ma3la
		.ma4str
		.md2
		.me2e
		.mel2a
		.men8schl
		.men8schw
		.men3t4
		.mi2t
		.mm2
		.näs5c
		.ni4e
		.nob4
		.no2c
		.no2s
		.no4th
		.nul2
		.nus2
		.ob1a
		.obe2
		.ohr5s
		.om2a
		.oper4
		.or2a
		.ort2
		.orts3e
		.ort4st
		.oste2
		.ost5end
		.osten8de
		.oste6re
		.ost3r
		.ozo4
		.pa4r1e
		.par3t4h
		.pf4
		.ph4
		.poka2
		.po4str
		.ps2
		.ra4s3s
		.reb3s2
		.re3cha
		.rein4t
		.reli1
		.reli3e
		.ri2as
		.richt6e
		.ro4a
		.ro3m4a
		.rö2s1c
		.ru5s6ses
		.rü1b
		.rücker6
		.rü4ss
		.sali1
		.sas2
		.sa5sse
		.säs4
		.sä5ss
		.sch4
		.sen3s
		.ser2u
		.se2t1
		.sha2
		.sim3p4
		.si2te
		.ski1e
		.spas4
		.spä5s4
		.spiege8lei
		.st4
		.sto4re
		.sucher6
		.tal2e
		.tan4k3l
		.ta2to
		.te2e
		.te2f
		.te3no
		.th4
		.ti2a
		.tid1
		.ti2s
		.tite4
		.to4nin
		.to4pl
		.to2w
		.tras3
		.tra4ss
		.tri3e4s
		.ts2
		.tu3ri
		.uf2e2
		.ufer1
		.ul4mei
		.um3
		.umo2
		.un3a2
		.un3d
		.un3e
		.un3g
		.uni2t
		.ur1
		.ur2i
		.urin4s
		.ur3o2m
		.uro2p
		.ur3s2
		.ut2a
		.ut3r
		.übe4
		.ve5n2e
		.vo4r
		.wah4l
		.wa2s
		.weg5s
		.wei4ta
		.wi4e
		.wor2
		.wort5en6
		.xe3
		.ya4l
		.zeit3s
		.zi2e
		.zin4st
		2aa
		a1ab
		aa2be
		aa1c
		aa2gr
		4a1a2n
		4a2ar
		aa2r1a
		aar3f4
		aart4
		aas1t
		aat4s1
		a3au
		a1ä
		a1b
		2aba
		ab1auf
		ab1ä
		ab2äu
		1abd
		ab1eb
		abe1e
		ab1eil
		2abel
		abe2la
		2a3ber
		ab1erk
		ab1err
		ab1erz
		ab3esse
		abes2t
		ab1eß
		2abet
		2abew
		1abf
		3abfi
		1abg
		1abh
		2abi
		ab1ins
		ab1ir
		ab1it
		1abk
		ab1l
		1a2bla
		ab5lag
		1a2blä
		2able
		ab4le.
		ab3li
		ab4lo
		3a2blö
		a2blu
		abma3s
		1abn
		2abo
		a2bo.
		ab2of
		3a2bon
		ab3r
		a3bra
		a4brä
		2abrü
		abs2a
		1absc
		ab3s2i
		1ab3sp
		abs4t4
		1absta
		ab3sz
		1abtei
		2abu
		ab1ur
		2abü
		1abw
		2aby
		1abz
		2ac.
		2aca
		2ac1c
		a1cem
		2ach.
		ach1a
		a1chal
		ach3au
		2achb
		a1che
		a2ch1e2c
		ach1ei
		a4cherf
		a4cherk
		a4cherö
		a4ch3erw
		4achf
		a1chi
		ach3l
		ach3m
		ach3n
		a1cho
		a3cho.
		ach1o2b
		ach1or
		ach3ö
		ach3r
		ach3su
		a4cht
		acht5erg
		ach2t1o
		ach8traum
		ach8träume.
		ach8träumen.
		ach6trit
		a1chu
		ach1u2f
		ach3ü
		2achv
		4ach1w
		a1ci
		ac1in
		2ack.
		ack2en
		ackmu4
		ackmus3
		ack2se
		ack3sl
		ack3sta4
		a1cl
		a3co
		acon4n
		2acu
		a1ç
		a1d
		2ada.
		a3d2ab
		ad2ag
		adai4
		ad3ama
		a2d1an
		3a4dap
		a3d2ar3
		4adav
		1a2dä
		ad1c
		1add
		2ade.
		ade2al
		adefi4
		a2dein
		2aden
		ade1r2a
		a2deri
		4ades2
		ade3sp
		ades6s
		2adf
		2adh
		4a3di
		adi3en
		5adj
		2ado
		ad2ob
		2adp
		2adq
		2ad3rec
		ad4res
		ad3ru
		2ads2
		ad3sz
		2ad2t1
		2adu
		2a1e1
		ae2b
		ae2d
		ae2i
		a2ek
		a2ela
		a2ele
		ae2o3
		ae2p
		3a2er2o
		a2et
		a2ew
		ae2x
		af1a
		a2fak
		a2fan
		a3far
		af4at
		a2fau
		2afe
		a2f1ec
		a2fent
		af1erl
		a2fex
		af2fl
		af4flu
		2afi
		2af3l
		a2fö
		af3ra
		af3rä
		af3re
		af3rö
		af3s2a
		af2sp
		af2t1a
		af2tei
		af4t3erl
		af2t3r
		aft5re
		af2tur
		a2f3ur
		a1g
		2aga
		ag1ab
		ag1a2d
		ag1ar
		ag1au
		ag2di
		ag2dr
		ag2du
		age1i
		age4na
		age4neb
		a2gent
		a4gentu
		age4ral
		2ages
		age2sa
		age4sel
		age4si
		age2s3p
		ages5s
		ag3esse
		age6stem
		ag3gl
		1aggr
		3a2git
		2a2gl
		ag4la
		a4glö
		ag2n
		ag4ne.
		ag4nu
		a2g3re
		a2g3ri
		ag4ro
		agsa2
		ag4sam
		ag3sc
		ags3p
		ag6spo
		ag4sti
		ag2str
		2agt
		ag2th
		a2gund
		2ah.
		2a1ha
		ah4at
		2a1he
		a2h1erh
		a1h2i
		ahin3
		ahl3a2
		ah4l1ei
		ah4l3erh
		ah2lö
		ahl3sz
		ah4n1a
		ah2nä
		ahner4e
		ahnt2
		1ahor
		ah1o2s
		a2h3ö
		ahr1a
		ah3r2e
		ahre4s3
		ah3ri
		ahrta4
		ahr4tri
		2ah2s
		aht1s
		a1hu
		ah1w
		a1hy
		2ai
		aian3
		aid4s
		aids1t
		ai1e2
		aif2
		ai3g4
		a3ik.
		ai3ke
		ai3ku
		ai2lo
		a1ind
		ain4e
		a1ing
		ain3sp
		ai2sa
		a3isch.
		ai3s2e
		aiso2
		aiss2
		ais3sen
		ais5st
		a3iv.
		aive3
		a3ivl
		a3ivs
		a1j
		2ak.
		1a2k4ad
		2akal
		2a3kam
		2akar
		ak4at
		1a2kaz
		2akb
		2akc
		2akd
		4a1ke
		a2kef
		aken2n
		a2keu
		2a1ki
		2ak3l
		ak4li
		4ako
		2a1kr
		ak3rau
		3akro3
		2aks
		ak3sh
		2akta
		2aktb
		ak3te
		ak4tei
		2aktik
		ak2t3r
		ak3t4ri
		2aktst
		2a1ku
		a2kun
		4a3kü
		1akz
		a1la
		2ala.
		ala5ch2
		al1af
		ala2g
		al1age
		a3lal
		al1am
		alami5
		al3amp
		al1ana
		a2l1ang
		al1ans
		al1anz
		a2lar
		a3lar.
		a3lare
		al2arm
		al3arr
		ala2s
		al1asi
		al1ass
		2alat
		al1au
		al3aug
		a1lä
		al1äm
		alb3ein
		alb3eis
		al4berh
		al4b3erw
		al2b1l
		alb3li
		al2boh
		al2br
		alb3ru
		alb3s
		al2dä
		al2dr
		al3du
		2ale
		3a2l1e2b
		3a2l1ef
		a4l1eh
		a2l1ei
		a4l3ein
		a2l1el
		alen1
		al3ends
		a2leng
		ale2p
		al1epo
		a2l1erf
		a2l1erh
		al1erl
		3alerm
		a2l1ert
		3a2lerz
		a2l1esk
		ale4t
		al1eta
		al1eth
		a2l1eu
		a4leur
		3a2lex
		alf4r
		3algi
		al2gli
		1algo
		2ali
		ali4ene
		al2imb
		ali4nal
		al1ins
		a2linv
		alk1ar
		1alkoh
		alk3s2
		al2lab
		al2l3a4r
		al2lau
		al4lec
		al3lend
		all5erfa
		al3les
		alli5er.
		alli7ers.
		al2lob
		3almb
		2alo
		a2l1o2b
		alo2ga
		al1ope
		al1orc
		a2l1ö
		al2ös
		3alpe.
		1alph
		al3skl
		al4spal
		al2sum
		al3sun
		al2tak
		alt3eig
		al3ter
		al4t3erf
		al2tö
		al2tre
		al2tri
		alt3ric
		al2tro
		alt2se
		alt4stü
		a1lu
		al2uf
		a2lum
		al1umb
		al1ur
		4aly
		alzer4z
		al2zw
		2am.
		2am2a
		amab4
		amad2
		ama3g
		2amä
		2ambiq
		am4e
		2ame.
		a2meb
		ame2n1
		amer2a
		a2meri
		ame3ru
		a4mesh
		a3met
		a2mew
		a3mi.
		a3mie
		2a3mir
		a3mis
		ami3t2a
		ami3ti
		2aml
		am2mac
		2ammal
		am2mei
		am2min
		2amml
		am4mod
		am2mus
		ammu2t
		a2mö
		amp2fa2
		am3pr
		2ams
		am4schl
		1amt.
		am2t1a
		am2t1ä
		am2tel
		am4t3ern
		am2tö
		am2t3r
		am2tu
		2amu
		2ana.
		2anab
		ana3c
		anadi3
		a3nak
		an1alg
		ana4lin
		2anam
		2anan
		2anas
		an1äs
		1anb
		2anbu
		an3ch
		2and.
		an3dac
		and4art
		ande4sc
		an2dex
		an2d3rü
		and4sas
		and6spas
		and6s5paß
		and2su
		2andu
		and1ur
		2ane
		an3ec
		a3nee
		an2ei.
		an3eif
		an1e4k
		3a4n1erb
		an1eth
		1anf
		2anfi
		anft3s
		an3f2u
		4ang.
		1anga
		3angeb
		an2g1ei
		an4g3erf
		an4g3erl
		an4g3erz
		2angf
		2angh
		2angie
		ang1l
		an2gla
		2ango
		ang1r
		an2g3ra
		4angs.
		ang3sc
		ang6s3po
		1anh
		2a3ni
		an2id
		ani5ers.
		3a4nim
		a4nins
		2anj
		2ank.
		an2k1an
		an2kei
		an3kl
		an4klö
		an2k3no
		ank1r
		an2k3ra
		an2k3rä
		ankt4
		an2ky
		1anl
		anma3s2
		2anmu
		2ann
		3an3na
		3annä
		an3n2e
		an1od
		a3nol
		a2n1or
		a3nos
		a1nö
		1anr
		1ansä
		1ansc
		ans2en
		an2seu
		2ansh
		2ansk
		an3skr
		ans1pa
		1anspr
		ans2te
		an3s2z
		2ant.
		an2t3a4r
		1antá
		1antei
		3antenn
		an3t4he
		1anthr
		2anto
		anton4
		3antr
		ant3rin
		an2tro
		1antw
		2a1nu
		anu3s
		a1nü
		1anw
		2anwet
		2anzb
		1anzei
		2anzes
		2anzg
		an2z1i4n
		2anzs
		1anzü
		2anzw
		an2zwi
		2ao
		ao1i4
		a1op
		a1or
		a1os
		ao3t2
		a3ot.
		a1ö
		a1p
		2ap.
		2a3pa
		2ape
		a2pef
		a3pel
		a2pé
		a2pf
		ap2fa
		a3pfl
		a3phä
		a2pht
		2ap3l
		ap2n
		a2pot
		3appl
		ap3pu
		2apr
		2a3pu
		2aq
		2ar.
		a1ra
		a3ra.
		ar2ab
		ar3abt
		ara3d2
		a2r3al
		a3ra3li
		a2r1ang
		a2r1ans
		a2r1anz
		a2r3app
		2a2rar
		a2r1au
		a1rä
		1arb
		2arb.
		4arba
		ar2bau
		ar2bec
		2arben
		2arbi
		ar2bl
		2arbr
		ar2bre
		2arbs2
		2arbt
		2arbu
		ar2b3un
		1ar1c
		ar2dro
		2are
		a2rea
		ar1eff
		a4reg
		a2reh
		ar1ehr
		a2rein
		a4rek
		a3ren
		aren4se
		are3r2a
		ar2erf
		a2r1erh
		a2reri
		a2rerl
		are3u
		ar2ew
		2arf
		arf1r
		ar2f3ra
		ar2gl
		ar2gn
		2arh
		2ari
		ar2ia
		ari3e4n
		ari3erd
		ari3erg
		ari5ers.
		ar1im
		arin3it
		ar1int
		a3riu
		ar2kal
		ark3amt
		ar2k1ar
		ark3aue
		ark3lag
		ar2kor
		ar4kri
		arks4
		ark3sa
		ark3sh
		ar2les
		arm2ä
		ar4merk
		ar3m2or
		ar2nan
		arn2e
		2a1ro
		ar1ob
		a2r1o2d
		a2r1op
		a2ror
		2arr
		ar2r3ad
		arre4n3
		ar2rh
		arr3he
		2arsa
		ar4schl
		arse3
		ar3s2h
		2arsi
		ar3t2e
		ar2the
		art2i
		artin2
		2arto
		art3r
		ar4tram
		2arts
		2aru
		ar1uh
		ar1um
		a2rü
		2arv
		arwa2
		2ary
		ar2zä
		2arze
		1arzt
		ar2z1w
		as1ala
		asas2
		asa3sse
		as3au
		asau2s1
		as1ä
		a2sca
		a3sche
		a4schec
		a3schi
		asch3la
		a2schm
		a3schu
		4a3s2e
		a4seb
		as3e2m
		a4sex
		4ash
		a4s3ha
		as4hi
		asin2g
		2a5sis
		asi4st
		a3skop
		a4s3l
		a4sn
		a1so1
		as1o2f
		a3sol
		as1or
		as1p
		as3pan
		a4s2ph
		as2pi
		a4spl
		as2po
		a1spu
		as3s2a
		ass2e
		as2s3ei
		as3sel
		as3ser
		asserma6
		as3s2i
		as2s1p
		as4st
		ass1ti
		ass1to
		as5str
		as5stu
		2asta
		a3stä
		a4s3tep
		as2ter
		2astr
		as4trau
		a4s2t3rä
		a2s2t3re
		a4strol
		a2stum
		a3su
		a4sw
		aswa2s
		3a2syl
		aße2
		aßen3
		2a1t
		at1ab
		at2a1f
		at4ag
		a2t1akt
		ata3l
		a3tam
		at1apf
		at1au
		a2taus
		a2t1ä
		at2c
		at2e
		4ate.
		a2teb
		at3eig
		a4teli
		4aten
		a2tep
		ate2ru
		4ates
		atex3
		at2h
		at3ha
		4athe1
		3athl
		4a3ti
		atingma5
		3atm
		4atmus
		ato4man
		4ator
		a2t1ort
		a2t1ö
		4atr
		atra4t
		at3rä
		at3re
		at3rom
		at2sa
		at4schn
		at2se
		at4set
		at2si
		ats1p
		at3ta
		at4tak
		att3ang
		at4tau
		at2tei
		at3t4hä
		at2t3rä
		att3s4
		at3tu
		atu2n
		atz1er
		at4zerk
		at4zerw
		at2z1i
		at2zo
		atz3t2
		at2z1w
		a2u
		2au.
		2au1a2
		2aub
		au2bli
		au2blo
		4auc
		auch3ta
		au2dr
		2aue
		aue2b
		au3en.
		au2ere
		au5erein
		au2fa
		auf1an
		2aufe.
		2aufeh
		auf1er
		au4ferk
		auff4
		3aufn
		2aug
		4augeh
		au3ha
		4au1i
		au2is
		2auj
		aule2s
		au3lü
		4aum
		au2mal
		au2m1o
		aum3p2
		aum3s2
		4aun
		au3n4a
		aun2e
		au2nio
		au1nu
		a4unz
		2aup2
		aup4ter
		2au3r2
		au2s1ah
		ausan8ne.
		au2sau
		2ausc
		au4schm
		au4scho
		1ausd
		aus3erp
		au4s3erw
		1ausf
		1ausg
		1ausl
		au2so
		au2spr
		1ausr
		auss2
		3aussag
		au3sse
		aus4se.
		au8ssende
		au2sta
		au4stec
		auster6m
		aus3tie
		aus3tri
		1ausü
		1ausz
		au3ß
		a4ut
		2aut.
		au2t1äu
		2aute
		au4ten4g
		au4t3erh
		3auto
		2auts
		2auu
		2auw
		2aux
		2auz
		auz2w
		2a1ü
		2a1v
		a3v4a
		ava3t4
		4a3vi
		a2vr
		av2s
		2a1w
		awi3
		awi1e
		a1x
		ax2am
		ax2e
		axi2s
		2a1ya
		a1yeu
		aysi1
		ay3t
		2a1z
		az2a3
		az2o
		az2u
		ä1a
		ä1b
		ä5be
		ä2b3l
		äb2s
		ä1che
		äche1e
		ächenma5
		ächenmas8
		ä1chi
		äch3l
		ä2chr
		äch2sp
		ä1chu
		äck2e
		ä1d
		ä2da
		ä2d1ia
		ä2dr
		äd2s
		2ä1e
		äf2fl
		äf3l
		äf3r
		äf2s
		äft2
		äft4s
		ä1g
		ä5ge
		äge1i
		ä2g3l
		äg2n
		ä2g3r
		äg4ra
		äg2s2
		äg3sc
		äg3str
		1ä2gy
		äh1a
		2ä3he
		ä3hi
		ähl1a
		ähl2e
		äh4l3e4be
		2ähm
		äh3ne
		äh3ri
		2äh2s
		2äh3t4
		ä1hu
		äh1w
		ä1im
		ä1is.
